Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202650-1804
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Office of Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare Act:

(1) Administrator means a person charged with administration of a program, an office, or a division of the department or administration of a private agency or licensed child care facility or the executive director;

(2) Child welfare system means public and private agencies and parties that provide or effect services or supervision to system-involved children and their families;

(3) Commission means the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice;

(4) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;

(5) Director means the chief executive officer of the department;

(6) Executive director means the executive director of the commission;

(7) Inspector General means the Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare appointed under section 50-1805;

(8) Juvenile services division means the Juvenile Services Division of the Office of Probation Administration;

(9) Licensed child care facility means a facility or program licensed under the Child Care Licensing Act, the Children's Residential Facilities and Placing Licensure Act, or sections 71-1901 to 71-1906.01;

(10) Malfeasance means a wrongful act that the actor has no legal right to do or any wrongful conduct that affects, interrupts, or interferes with performance of an official duty;

(11) Management means supervision of subordinate employees;

(12) Misfeasance means the improper performance of some act that a person may lawfully do;

(13) Obstruction means hindering an investigation, preventing an investigation from progressing, stopping or delaying the progress of an investigation, or making the progress of an investigation difficult or slow;

(14) Office means the office of Inspector General of Nebraska Child Welfare and includes the Inspector General and other employees of the office;

(15) Private agency means a child welfare agency that contracts with the department or the Office of Probation Administration or contracts to provide services to another child welfare agency that contracts with the department or the Office of Probation Administration;

(16) Record means any recording, in written, audio, electronic transmission, or computer storage form, including, but not limited to, a draft, memorandum, note, report, computer printout, notation, or message, and includes, but is not limited to, medical records, mental health records, case files, clinical records, financial records, and administrative records. Such term does not include any such materials used exclusively as part of a judge's deliberative process; and

(17) Responsible individual means a foster parent, a relative provider of foster care, or an employee of the department, the juvenile services division, the commission, a foster home, a private agency, a licensed child care facility, or another provider of child welfare programs and services responsible for the care or custody of records, documents, and files.

Laws 2012, LB821, § 10;

Laws 2015, LB347, § 6;

R.S.1943, (2016), § 43-4303;

Laws 2025, LB298, § 27.

Child Care Licensing Act, see section 71-1908.

Children's Residential Facilities and Placing Licensure Act, see section 71-1924.